Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
PART 1 Management of Budgetary and Financial Affairs

45-12-70.
Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Budget Act.”

History.

Code 1933, § 40-401, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1.

45-12-71.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Annual operating budget” means the operating budget for each budget unit which details the appropriations passed by the General Assembly for that budget unit.

“Appropriation” means an authorization by the General Assembly to a budget unit to expend, from public funds, a sum of money not in excess of the sum specified, for the purposes specified in the authorization and under the procedure described in this part.

“Appropriation Act” means an Act of the General Assembly which authorizes the expenditure of state money.

“Budget” means the complete financial plan for the fiscal year as proposed in the budget report and modified and adopted by appropriation and revenue Acts.

“Budget allotment” means a process of authorizing the withdrawal of state funds from the treasury based on a determination that the budget allotment request is consistent with an approved work program.

“Budget class” means one of the kinds of expenditures denoting a class of service or commodities purchased or properties acquired as specified in the classification of expenditures provided for in this part for use in expenditure accounting, in the making of budget estimates, and in the budget reports and budgets.

“Budget estimate” means the statement with accompanying explanations, as provided in this part, in which a budget unit states its financial requirements and requests appropriations.

“Budget message” means the required statement by the Governor to the General Assembly after its convening which gives a summary description of the Governor’s proposed financial policies and plans contained in the budget report, together with recommendations for additional revenues, if any.

“Budget report” and “program budget report” mean recommendations of the Governor to the General Assembly as to financial plans and expenditures to be authorized and agency program information, with the accompanying statements and explanations provided for in this part.

“Budget unit” means a department, institution, agency, or other unit of organization for which separate appropriations are made.

“Core businesses” means broad policy areas that a budget unit was created to address. These are fundamental activities or groups of activities critical to the organization’s overall mission.

“Outcome measure” means quantitative and qualitative indicators by which the performance of a program can be assessed against adopted goals and objectives.

“Program” means a discrete set of activities undertaken to carry out an agency’s core businesses.

“Strategic planning” means the process through which a preferred future direction and organizational mission are established and periodically updated in light of changing trends and issues and goals, objectives, and strategies are adopted and implemented to guide an organization toward that preferred future direction.

“Tax expenditure” means any statutory provision which exempts, in whole or in part, any specific class or classes of persons, income, goods, services, or property from the impact of established state taxes, including but not limited to tax deductions, tax allowances, tax exclusions, tax credits, preferential tax rates, and tax exemptions. Such term shall also include any expenditure of state tax proceeds to local governments for homeowner tax relief grants or local government assistance grants authorized by or required by any provision of Article VII of the Constitution.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-402, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 976, § 1/HB 509; Ga. L. 2010, p. 193, § 1/SB 206.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Budget Accountability and Planning Act of 1993.’ ”

45-12-72.
Establishment of Office of Planning and Budget; general provisions.

There is established in the office of the Governor the Office of Planning and Budget as a separate budget unit for the purpose of promoting economy and efficiency in the fiscal management of the state government. The Governor shall be ex officio director of the budget.

The Governor, through the Office of Planning and Budget, shall have such supervision of every public department, agency, and institution as shall be necessary to secure uniformity and accuracy of accounts and efficient conduct of its fiscal affairs. He may inquire into the methods of conducting the affairs of any public body; he may prescribe and direct the use of such forms of accounts, records, and reports as may be necessary to further efficiency and an adequate system of records for budget-making purposes; and he may prescribe and direct the use of standards of efficiency for public employees, including the establishment of working hours.

The administrative head of the Office of Planning and Budget is the director of the Office of Planning and Budget, who shall be appointed by the Governor to serve at the Governor’s pleasure. The director shall be responsible for management of the office and shall exercise supervision and control over the office. The director of the Office of Planning and Budget is authorized to employ such other professional, technical, and clerical personnel as the director may deem necessary to carry out the duties prescribed in this part. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the employees of the Office of Planning and Budget shall be governed by the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board, under Article 1 of Chapter 20 of this title. The Office of Planning and Budget shall pay its share of the administrative cost of operating the state system of personnel management in the manner prescribed in Code Section 45-20-4. All employees in the position classification policy coordinator shall be in the unclassified service as defined by Code Section 45-20-2. Any and all salary increases for such employees shall be based, in part, on each individual employee’s job performance as measured by a standard operative appraisal system and, in part, on general increases given to all state employees. The Governor is authorized to delegate to the director of the Office of Planning and Budget such powers, duties, and authority under this part as the Governor deems advisable; and the Governor shall have the right to retract any such delegation at any time.

The Attorney General, the state treasurer, the comptroller general, the state revenue commissioner, and the state auditor shall render such advice and assistance and furnish such information to the Office of Planning and Budget as may be requested and needed.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-403, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 427, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, §§ 202, 206; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1399, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-73/HB 642; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 45/HB 79.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-12-73.
Powers and duties generally.

The Office of Planning and Budget, at the direction and under the control of the Governor and subject to this part, shall perform the following functions:

Develop and implement a process of strategic planning to establish and periodically update an overall plan for state government and require all state agencies to develop a strategic plan that is consistent with that overall state plan. The Office of Planning and Budget may assist departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, institutions, authorities, and other agencies in developing those plans and in tailoring them to those organizations’ program needs;

Develop and implement a program budgeting system that relates funding to achievement of established goals and objectives, measures agency performance against attainment of planned outcomes, and provides for program evaluations for policy and funding determinations. Program evaluations may include cost benefit analyses, decision analyses, statistical analyses, comparisons with similar programs in other jurisdictions, relevant historical trends, and demographic factors and other useful techniques;

Develop financial policies and plans as the basis for budget recommendations to the General Assembly and prepare detailed documents in accordance with such financial policies and plans for presentation to the General Assembly. The Office of Planning and Budget shall make its records and information available at all times to the General Assembly and its designees;

Coordinate the fiscal affairs and procedures of the state to assure the carrying out of the financial plans and policies approved by the General Assembly, including the administration of a system of annual operating budgets and amendments thereto and of expenditure control;

Develop plans for improvements and economies in organization and operation of the state agencies and implement such plans as are approved by the General Assembly;

Develop a long-term capital improvements budget which emphasizes decentralization of state government and which is consistent with the overall strategic plan for consideration by the General Assembly;

Analyze financial and administrative aspects of proposed legislation;

Provide such assistance as the General Assembly may request and be available to assist its appropriations committees with any needed information or material;

Perform all other duties provided for in this part and such other duties as the General Assembly may from time to time prescribe;

In an effort to improve responsiveness of government and the effective and efficient delivery of services, provide leadership in initiating, organizing, and operating partnerships and collaborations among public and private entities having common or overlapping missions, purposes, roles, responsibilities, clients, or other similar relationships;

Consult with the General Assembly on a regular basis concerning the development and implementation of the strategic planning process, the development of outcome measures for program evaluation, and the implementation of the other provisions of this article; and

Promulgate rules and regulations governing:

The use of passenger-carrying automobiles purchased or leased by any office, agency, department, board, bureau, commission, institution, authority, or other entity of the state;

The rental of passenger-carrying automobiles by officials, officers, and employees of the state and for reimbursement of rental expense;

A system of billings for motor vehicle service including the provision of fuel, maintenance, and repair costs for vehicles which are owned or leased by any office, agency, department, board, bureau, commission, institution, authority, or other entity of the state; and

Acquisition, utilization, preventive maintenance, repair, and replacement of all other motor vehicles, exclusive of the off-the-road and highly specialized motor vehicle equipment as defined by the Office of Planning and Budget, owned or leased by any office, agency, department, board, bureau, commission, institution, authority, or other entity of the state.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-404, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 3; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1865, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 117, § 16/HB 312; Ga. L. 2005, p. 976, § 2/HB 509.

Cross references.

Powers and duties of director of Office of Planning and Budgeting in implementing Residential Conservation Service Act of 1981, T. 46, C. 4A.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, in the second sentence in paragraph (2), “factors” was substituted for “factors,” and a semicolon was substituted for a period at the end.

Editor’s notes.

The State Department of Audits and Accounts and the State Office of Planning and Budget are authorized and directed by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1365 (Senate Resolution No. 101; see §

45-7-28.1

) to develop, issue, review and revise rules and regulations governing reimbursement of travel expenses of employees of state agencies, boards, and commissions.

The State Department of Audits and Accounts is further authorized and directed to include in its annual audit of the financial accounts of state agencies, boards, and commissions any audit exception to the rules and regulations.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Budget Accountability and Planning Act of 1993.’ ”

Resolution Act No. 48 (Senate Resolution
No. 101), approved April 19, 1979 (Ga. L. 1979, p. 1365), relating to the development, issuance, review, and revision of employee travel reimbursement policies by the Department of Audits and the Office of Planning and Budget, was repealed by Ga. L. 2005, p. 694, § 41.

45-12-74.
Budget report — Preparation and submission to General Assembly.

The Governor, through the Office of Planning and Budget, shall prepare and submit a budget report to the General Assembly within five days after its organization for consideration either with or without amendments and modifications by the General Assembly.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-405, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1.

45-12-75.
Budget report — Contents and form.

The budget report shall contain and include the following information:

Summary statements of the financial condition of the state, accompanied by such detailed schedules of assets and liabilities as the Governor deems desirable, which shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

A comparative consolidated balance sheet showing all the assets and liabilities of the state and the surplus or deficit, as the case may be, at the close of each of the two fiscal years last concluded;

Summary statements of fund balances showing in detail for each fund the surplus or deficit at the beginning of each of the two fiscal years last concluded, the actual income of that year, the total appropriation of that year, and the total expenditures of that year; and

Similar summary statements of the estimated fund balances for the current fiscal year and the next fiscal year;

Statements of income and receipts for each of the two fiscal years last concluded, and the estimated income and receipts of the current fiscal year and the next fiscal year, and a statement of unappropriated surplus expected to have accrued in the state treasury at the beginning of the next fiscal year. The statements of income and estimated income shall be itemized by sources and by the budget unit collecting the same. The statements of receipts and estimated receipts shall be itemized by sources and by the budget unit receiving the same. Existing sources of income and receipts shall be analyzed as to their equity, productivity, and need for revision, and any proposed new sources of income or receipts shall be explained;

Summary statements of expenditures and disbursements for each of the two fiscal years last concluded, itemized by budget units under functional heads and showing the amounts expended for each major function of the government;

A statement of the surplus account, showing the excess of all current assets over all current liabilities as of the end of each of the two fiscal years last concluded and all changes in surplus account during each of such two fiscal years;

Detailed comparative statements of expenditures and requests for appropriations by funds, budget units, and budget classes, showing the expenditures for each of the two fiscal years last concluded, the budget of the current year, and the Governor’s recommendations for appropriations for each budget unit for the next fiscal year. Following the lists of actual and proposed expenditures of each budget unit there shall be a brief explanation of the functions of the unit and comments on its policies and plans and on any considerable differences among the amounts expended and the amounts recommended, with such descriptive, quantitative, comparative, and other data as to work done, unit costs, and like information as is considered necessary or desirable. In connection with each budget class of capital outlays involving construction projects to be completed in two or more fiscal years, there shall be shown the total estimated cost of each such project and the amount thereof recommended to be appropriated and expended in each ensuing fiscal year until completion of the project. Capital outlay needs shall be projected for a period that is consistent with each organization’s approved strategic plan as summarized in the budget;

A summary statement of the cash resources estimated to be available at the beginning of the next fiscal year and the estimated cash receipts of the fiscal year as compared with the total recommended amounts of appropriation for all budget classes for the year and, if the total of the recommended expenditures exceeds the total of the estimated resources, recommendations as to how the deficiency is to be met and estimates of receipts from any proposed additional revenues;

A draft of a proposed General Appropriations Act or Acts embodying the Governor’s budget report and recommendations for appropriations for the next fiscal year and drafts of such revenue and other Acts as may be recommended for putting into effect the proposed financial plan. The recommended appropriation for each budget unit shall be specified in a separate section of the General Appropriations Act. The total amount of appropriations recommended shall not exceed the cash resources available to meet expenditures under such appropriations;

A tax expenditure review for the state. Such review shall be prepared by the Department of Audits and Accounts and provided to the Office of Planning and Budget in a timely manner for inclusion as part of the budget report. Such review shall detail for each tax expenditure item that amount of tax revenue forgone for at least a three-year period, including the period covered in the Governor’s budget submitted the preceding January, the current budget, and an estimate of one future year; a citation of the statutory or other legal authority for the expenditure; the year in which it was enacted; and the tax year in which it became effective. The tax expenditure review may also include a regularly produced annex to include analysis of specific tax expenditures. Such analysis shall include, when possible: a description of the objective of the tax expenditure taken from original legislation; information relevant to determining whether the expenditure is meeting its stated purpose; an analysis of the tax expenditure’s effect on the administration of the tax system; and an analysis of the persons, corporations, or other entities that are directly benefited by the expenditure. The tax expenditure information required under this paragraph shall be tracked and compiled by the Department of Revenue and provided in a timely manner to the Department of Audits and Accounts. Taxes included in this report shall cover all state taxes collected by the Department of Revenue. The Department of Revenue shall be authorized to provide estimations in the event the required tax expenditure information cannot be actually determined from available information. The Department of Revenue shall not be authorized to impose additional reporting requirements on any person or entity in order to track and compile any tax expenditure information. Nothing in this paragraph shall preclude the Department of Audits and Accounts from contracting out the preparation and analysis associated with the development of such report to any member institution of the University System of Georgia; and

Such other information as the Governor deems desirable or as is required by law.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-406, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 427, § 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 673, §§ 1-5; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 4; Ga. L. 2010, p. 193, § 2/SB 206; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 45/HB 142; Ga. L. 2013, p. 888, § 1/HB 454.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Budget Accountability and Planning Act of 1993.’ ”

45-12-75.1.
Zero-base budgeting; intent; departmental priority lists.

Repealed pursuant to its own terms effective June 30, 2020.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 2012, p. 987, § 1/SB 33; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 45/HB 79; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 45/SB 340.

This Code section formerly pertained to annual continuation budget report. The former Code section was based on Code 1981, §

45-12-75.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 5; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1036, § 30/SB 49 and was repealed by Ga. L. 2008, p. VO1, § 2-2, effective January 28, 2008.

45-12-76.
Limitations on appropriations by General Assembly; supplementary appropriations.

The General Assembly shall not appropriate funds for any given fiscal year which, in aggregate, exceed a sum equal to the amount of unappropriated surplus expected to have accrued in the state treasury at the beginning of the fiscal year, together with an amount not greater than the total treasury receipts from existing revenue sources anticipated to be collected in the fiscal year, less refunds, as estimated in the budget report and amendments thereto. Supplementary appropriations, if any, shall be made in the manner provided in Article III, Section IX, Paragraph V of the Constitution of Georgia, but in no event shall a supplementary appropriations Act continue in force and effect beyond the expiration of the General Appropriations Act in effect when such supplementary appropriations Act was adopted and approved.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-407, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 61.

45-12-77.
Requirement of emergency appropriation; manner of allocation.

In order to provide for the emergency needs of the state agencies, which needs were not ascertainable at the time of the submission of the budget report to the General Assembly or at the time of the enactment of the General Appropriations Act, the General Appropriations Act shall contain a specific sum as an emergency appropriation. The manner of allocation of such emergency appropriation shall be as follows: the head of the budget unit desiring an allotment of funds from the appropriation shall present such request to the Governor, in such form and with such explanation as he may require, and the Governor may allow or disallow the request at his discretion. No allotment shall be made from this appropriation to a purpose which creates a continuing obligation for the state.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-408, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1.

45-12-78.
Heads of budget units to submit annual estimates; preparation and submission of budget estimates of legislative and judicial agencies; review of budget estimates by Office of Planning and Budget.

The head of each budget unit, other than the General Assembly and the judiciary, shall annually submit to the Office of Planning and Budget estimates of the financial requirements of the budget unit for the next fiscal year, by the date set by the director of the Office of Planning and Budget, which shall be no earlier than August 1 of each year, on the forms and in the manner prescribed by the Office of Planning and Budget, with such explanatory data as is required by the Office of Planning and Budget. Such submission shall utilize such budget classes and be within such expenditure parameters as may be established by the Governor. The head of a budget unit also may submit such additional data as is helpful. The estimates so submitted shall bear the approval of the board or commission of each budget unit for which a board or commission is constituted.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the budget estimates for the General Assembly, including all the legislative agencies, shall be prepared by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President of the Senate and such other legislative officers as appropriate and shall be submitted to the director of the budget at the same time as other budget estimates are submitted. The Department of Audits and Accounts, for the purpose of this part, is a legislative agency and shall be construed in all respects as such; and the budget estimate for said department shall be prepared by the state auditor and shall be included in the budget report without revision and shall not be subject to review or control by the Office of Planning and Budget. The state treasurer shall assist in the preparation of these budget estimates, if requested. Effective with the budget estimates for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1985, the budget estimates for the Senate, the office of the Lieutenant Governor, and the office of the Secretary of the Senate shall be prepared by the Senate; the budget estimates for the House of Representatives, the office of the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the office of the Clerk of the House of Representatives shall be prepared by the House of Representatives; and the budget estimates for the Office of Legislative Counsel, the Office of Legislative Fiscal Officer, and the Office of Legislative Budget Analyst shall be prepared by the Legislative Services Committee. All of such budget estimates shall include such object classes as the Legislative Services Committee shall determine, and transfers of funds may be made between such object classes. Funds may also be transferred between the Senate, the office of the Lieutenant Governor, and the office of the Secretary of the Senate. Funds may also be transferred between the House of Representatives, the office of the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the office of the Clerk of the House of Representatives. Funds may also be transferred between the Office of Legislative Counsel, the Office of Legislative Fiscal Officer, and the Office of Legislative Budget Analyst.

Budget estimates for the judiciary shall be prepared by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court and the Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals and such other judicial officers as appropriate and shall be submitted to the director of the budget at the same time as other budget estimates are submitted. The state treasurer shall assist in the preparation of these budget estimates, if requested.

All of the data relative to the legislative and judicial branches of the government shall be for the information and guidance of the Office of Planning and Budget in estimating the total financial needs of the state for the ensuing period, but none of these estimates shall be subject to revision or review by the Office of Planning and Budget and must be included in the budget report as prepared by it.

To effect the goal of decentralization, prior to September 1 of each year, the Office of Planning and Budget shall send all requests for new, expanded, relocated, or renovated rental real estate space to the State Properties Commission. The State Properties Commission shall return such evaluation to the Office of Planning and Budget prior to the Governor’s submission of the budget to the General Assembly as provided in Code Section 45-12-79.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-409, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 673, §§ 6, 7; Ga. L. 1984, p. 359, § 8; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 45; Ga. L. 1985, p. 669, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 6; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1865, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 976, § 3/HB 509; Ga. L. 2008, p. 577, § 19/SB 396; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Budget Accountability and Planning Act of 1993.’ ”

45-12-79.
Governor to examine estimates and make revisions; budget report printing and transmission to General Assembly; examination of report by Governor-elect and his designated budget representatives.

The Governor shall examine the statements and estimates before their submission to the General Assembly and shall make or cause to be made such further investigations by the Office of Planning and Budget, with such hearings before him as he deems advisable, and shall direct such changes or revisions in policy and program and in specific details as he finds warranted.

The Governor shall have the budget report printed and copies thereof shall be transmitted to each member of the General Assembly within five days of the organization of the General Assembly.

The Governor-elect and his designated budget representatives shall be entitled to examine the budget report in process and the Office of Planning and Budget shall provide him with every practicable facility for familiarizing himself with its contents.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-410, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1.

45-12-80.
Appropriations Act to adopt financial plans; effect of annual appropriation Acts; supplementary appropriations Acts; submission of budget to Office of Planning and Budget.

The financial plan for each fiscal year, as presented in the budget report, shall be adopted, with such modifications as are made by the General Assembly, by the passage of a General Appropriations Act and such revenue and other Acts as are necessary for the purpose.

Each General Appropriations Act, now of force or hereafter adopted, with such amendments as are adopted from time to time shall continue in force and effect for the next fiscal year after adoption; and it shall then expire except for the mandatory appropriations required by the Constitution of Georgia or those required to meet contractual obligations authorized by the Constitution of Georgia or the continued appropriation of federal grants.

In addition to the appropriations made by the General Appropriations Act and amendments thereto, the General Assembly may make additional appropriations by Acts, which shall be known as supplementary appropriations Acts, provided no such supplementary appropriation shall be available unless there is an unappropriated surplus in the state treasury or the revenue necessary to pay such appropriation shall have been provided by a tax laid for such purpose and collected into the general fund of the state treasury. Neither house shall pass a supplementary appropriation bill until the General Appropriations Act shall have been finally adopted by both houses and approved by the Governor.

The annual operating budget for each budget unit shall be submitted for approval to the Office of Planning and Budget by May 31 of the fiscal year preceding the effective date; shall be submitted on forms and in the format as determined by the Office of Planning and Budget; and shall conform to approved appropriations Acts. The total annual operating budget, including such schedules and supplementary information as may be required by the Office of Planning and Budget, shall be considered the financial plan for the budget unit. The various schedules included in the annual operating budget shall govern the approved expenditures for the applicable object class and shall ensure that these expenditures conform to both the letter and the intent of approved appropriations Acts. The Governor through the Office of Planning and Budget shall direct to be made such changes in the submitted annual operating budget as the Governor deems necessary to bring the annual operating budget into conformity with approved appropriations Acts.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-412, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 673, § 8; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 7.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Budget Accountability and Planning Act of 1993.’ ”

45-12-81.
Procedure and restriction for expenditures by state and budget units thereof.

All expenditures by the state and its budget units of moneys drawn from the state treasury shall be made under the authority of appropriations Acts, which shall be based upon a budget provided in this part; and no money shall be drawn from the treasury except by appropriation made by law pursuant to Article III, Section IX, Paragraph I of the Constitution of Georgia.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-413, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 61.

45-12-82.
Periodic work programs to be filed; funds not to be allotted until program approved; content and form of program; amendment of program; filing of copies of program.

The Governor, through the Office of Planning and Budget, shall require each budget unit, other than those of the legislative branch and the judicial branch, to file periodic work programs with the Office of Planning and Budget at such time as the Office of Planning and Budget shall direct. As provided in Code Section 45-12-83, no allotment of funds shall be approved for any budget unit until such budget unit has filed a periodic work program with the Office of Planning and Budget and the periodic work program has been approved by the Governor. The work program shall be presented on forms prescribed by the Office of Planning and Budget and shall contain such information as the Governor, through the Office of Planning and Budget, may require.
The work program shall include the amount of the portion of the appropriation required for the period’s expenditures based on the budget prepared as provided in this part. Periodic work programs may be amended from time to time in such manner as the Office of Planning and Budget may require.
A duplicate copy of all of the periodic work programs and any amendments thereto shall be filed simultaneously with the Office of Planning and Budget, the state treasurer, the state auditor, the Senate Budget and Evaluation Office, and the House Budget and Research Office.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-414, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 45; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 8; Ga. L. 2008, p. VO1, § 1-1/HB 529; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 45/SB 340.

The 2014 amendment,

effective April 29, 2014, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Senate Budget and Evaluation Office, and the House Budget and Research Office” for “Senate Budget Office, and the House Budget Office” in the last sentence.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Budget Accountability and Planning Act of 1993.’ ”

45-12-83.
Requirement of filing of requests by budget units for allotment of funds; time and form of requests.

No funds may be made available for expenditure by any budget unit, other than the units of the legislative branch and the judicial branch, until such budget unit has filed a request for allotment of appropriations with the Office of Planning and Budget and the request for allotment has been approved by the Governor. Requests for allotment of appropriations for ordinary, recurring expenses shall be filed not later than five days before the beginning of each month. Requests for allotment of appropriations for extraordinary expenses or capital outlay may be filed at such times as the Office of Planning and Budget may prescribe. The request for allotment shall be presented on forms prescribed by the Office of Planning and Budget and shall be supplemented by such information as the Office of Planning and Budget may require.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-415, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1.

45-12-83.1.
Display of state flag by agencies.

As used in this Code section, the term “agency” means:

Every state department, agency, board, bureau, commission, public corporation, and authority;

Every county, municipal corporation, school district, or other political subdivision of this state;

Every department, agency, board, bureau, commission, authority, or similar body of each such county, municipal corporation, or other political subdivision of the state; and

Every city, county, regional, or other authority established pursuant to the laws of this state.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 50-3-4.1, any agency which is eligible to receive appropriated state funds shall be required to display the Georgia state flag provided for in Code Section 50-3-1. No funds may be made available for expenditure by any agency which is not in compliance with the provisions of this subsection. The Office of Planning and Budget shall investigate any allegations of noncompliance with the provisions of this Code section. The Office of Planning and Budget and the Office of the State Treasurer shall enforce the provisions of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-12-83.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296.

Cross references.

Description of state flag, §

50-3-1

.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 enactment of this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 305 (2001).

45-12-84.
Review of periodic work programs and requests for allotment of funds generally.

The Governor, through the Office of Planning and Budget, shall review the periodic work programs submitted by the budget units for conformity to the budget approved by the General Assembly.

The Governor, through the Office of Planning and Budget, shall review the requests for allotment of funds for conformity to the approved periodic work program.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-416, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 9.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Budget Accountability and Planning Act of 1993.’ ”